el: Πειθαρχία σέλας: Γενικής χρήσης (GP); Αυστραλιανό (Stock); Αγώνες με βαρέλια (Barrel Racing); Cutting; Ιππική δεξιοτεχνία (Dressage); Αντοχή/Πεζοπορία; Αγγλικό (Γενικό); Ιππικό τρίαθλο (Eventing); Ιβηρικό/Ισπανικό; Άλματα/Στενής επαφής; Στρατιωτικό/Αστυνομικό; Πόλο; Ιπποδρομίες/Προπόνηση; Ράντσου/Wade; Reining; Roping; Αναψυχής/Μονοπατιού; Γουέστερν (Γενικό); Γουέστερν Show; Άλλο
sk-SK: Sedlová disciplína: Všestranné (GP); Austrálske; Barrel Racing; Cutting; Drezúrne; Vytrvalostné/Turistické; Anglické (všeobecné); Všestranná spôsobilosť (Eventing); Iberské/španielske; Skokové/Close Contact; Vojenské/policajné; Pólo; Dostihové/tréningové; Rančerské/Wade; Reining; Roping; Trail/Pleasure; Westernové (všeobecné); Western Show; Iné
sv: Sadeldisciplin: Allround; Australisk stock; Barrel racing; Cutting; Dressyr; Distans/turridning; Engelsk (allmän); Fälttävlan; Iberisk/Spansk; Hopp/Close contact; Militär/polis; Polo; Galopp/träning; Ranch/wade; Reining; Roping; Trail/pleasure; Western (allmän); Western show; Övrigt
es: Disciplina de la montura: Uso general (GP); Australiana tipo stock; Carrera de barriles; Apartado de ganado; Doma clásica; Resistencia/marcha; Inglesa (general); Concurso completo; Ibérica/española; Salto/contacto estrecho; Militar/policial; Polo; Carreras/ejercicio; Rancho/wade; Rienda; Lazo; Paseo/recreación; Western (general); Western de exhibición; Otra
hu: Nyereg szakága: Univerzális (GP); Ausztrál stock; Hordókerülés; Cutting; Díjlovaglás; Távlovaglás/Trekking; Angol (általános); Lovastusa; Ibériai/spanyol; Díjugratás/Close contact; Katonai/rendőrségi; Lovaspóló; Verseny/Gyakorló; Ranch/Wade; Reining; Lasszózás; Tereplovaglás/Szabadidős; Western (általános); Western show; Egyéb
zh-TW: 座墊騎乘項目: 綜合 (GP); 澳洲牧羊馬鞍; 繞桶賽; 截牛; 馬場馬術; 耐力賽 / 長途騎乘; 英式 (一般); 三日賽; 伊比利 / 西班牙式; 障礙超越 / 貼身; 軍用 / 警用; 馬球; 競速 / 訓練; 牧場 / Wade; 西部馬術; 套犢; 越野 / 趣味; 西部 (一般); 西部表演賽; 其他
pt-PT: Modalidade do selim: Uso geral (GP); Stock australiano; Corrida de barris; Cutting; Dressage; Resistência/trekking; Inglês (geral); Concurso completo; Ibérico/espanhol; Salto/contacto próximo; Militar/polícia; Polo; Corrida/exercício; Rancho/wade; Reining; Roping; Passeio/lazer; Western (geral); Western show; Outro
de: Satteldisziplin: Vielseitigkeit (VSS); Australian Stock; Barrel Racing; Cutting; Dressur; Distanz/Trekking; Englisch (Allgemein); Vielseitigkeit; Iberisch/Spanisch; Springen/Close Contact; Militär/Polizei; Polo; Rennen/Training; Ranch/Wade; Reining; Roping; Trail/Pleasure; Western (Allgemein); Western Show; Sonstige
en: Saddle discipline: All-purpose (GP); Australian Stock; Barrel Racing; Cutting; Dressage; Endurance/Trekking; English (General); Eventing; Iberian/Spanish; Jump/Close Contact; Military/Police; Polo; Racing/Exercise; Ranch/Wade; Reining; Roping; Trail/Pleasure; Western (General); Western Show; Other
fr: Discipline de la selle: Mixte; Australienne; Barrel racing; Cutting; Dressage; Endurance / Randonnée; Anglaise (général); Concours complet; Ibérique / Espagnole; Obstacle / Close contact; Militaire / Police; Polo; Course / Entraînement; Ranch / Wade; Reining; Roping; Promenade / Loisir; Western (général); Western (compétition); Autre
ja: 鞍上での種目: 総合用 (GP); オーストラリアンストック; バレルレーシング; カッティング; 馬場馬術; エンデュランス / トレッキング; イングリッシュ (一般); 総合馬術; イベリアン / スパニッシュ; 障害飛越 / クロースコンタクト; 軍用 / 警察用; ポロ; 競馬 / 調教用; ランチ / ウェイド; レイニング; ローピング; トレイル / プレジャー; ウェスタン (一般); ウェスタンショー; その他
pt-BR: Sela modalidade: Uso geral (GP); Australiana; Três tambores; Apartação; Adestramento; Enduro/Passeio; Inglesa (geral); Concurso completo; Ibérica/Espanhola; Salto/Contato direto; Militar/Policial; Polo; Corrida/Exercício; Rancho/Wade; Rédeas; Laço; Trilha/Lazer; Western (geral); Western (competição); Outros
it: Disciplina per la sella: Multiuso (GP); Stock australiana; Barrel racing; Cutting; Dressage; Endurance/Trekking; Monta inglese (generale); Concorso completo; Monta iberica/spagnola; Salto ostacoli/Close contact; Militare/Polizia; Polo; Galoppo/Allenamento; Ranch/Wade; Reining; Roping; Passeggiata/Pleasure; Monta western (generale); Western show; Altro
nl: Zadel discipline: Veelzijdigheid (GP); Australisch stock; Barrelracing; Cutting; Dressuur; Endurance/trekking; Engels (algemeen); Eventing; Iberisch/Spaans; Springen/close contact; Militair/politie; Polo; Racen/trainen; Ranch/Wade; Reining; Roping; Trail/pleasure; Western (algemeen); Westernshow; Overige
hr-HR: Disciplina u sedlu: Višenamjensko; Australsko; Utrke oko bačvi; Cutting; Dresurno; Daljinsko jahanje / terensko; Englesko (općenito); Svestrana upotreba; Ibersko / španjolsko; Preponsko / bliski kontakt; Vojno/policijsko; Polo; Trkaće/trening; Rančersko / Wade; Reining; Hvatanje lasom (Roping); Terensko/rekreativno; Western (općenito); Western Show; Ostalo
da: Sadeldisciplin: Kombineret (GP); Australian stock; Barrel racing; Cutting; Dressur; Distance/trekking; Engelsk (generel); Military; Iberisk/spansk; Spring/close contact; Militær/politi; Polo; Væddeløb/træning; Ranch/wade; Reining; Roping; Trail/pleasure; Western (generel); Western show; Andet
ro-RO: Disciplină pentru șa: Uz general (GP); Australian Stock; Barrel Racing; Cutting; Dresaj; Anduranță/Trekking; Englezească (General); Probă completă; Iberică/Spaniolă; Sărituri/Close Contact; Militară/Poliție; Polo; Curse/Antrenament; Ranch/Wade; Reining; Roping; Drumeții/Agrement; Western (General); Spectacol Western; Altele
ko: 안장 승마 종목: 다목적(GP); 오스트레일리안 스톡; 배럴 레이싱; 커팅; 마장마술; 지구력/트레킹; 잉글리시(일반); 종합마술; 이베리안/스패니시; 점프/클로즈 콘택트; 군용/경찰용; 폴로; 경주용/훈련용; 랜치/웨이드; 레이닝; 로핑; 트레일/플레저; 웨스턴(일반); 웨스턴 쇼; 기타
vi: Kỷ luật cưỡi ngựa: Đa năng (GP); Kiểu Úc; Đua ngựa quanh thùng; Lùa bò; Biểu diễn (Dressage); Sức bền/Đi đường dài; Kiểu Anh (Thông thường); Cưỡi ngựa 3 môn phối hợp (Eventing); Kiểu Iberia/Tây Ban Nha; Nhảy/Tiếp xúc gần; Quân đội/Cảnh sát; Mã cầu (Polo); Đua/Tập luyện; Nông trại/Kiểu Wade; Điều khiển ngựa; Bắt bò bằng thòng lọng; Đi đường mòn/Giải trí; Kiểu miền Tây (Thông thường); Biểu diễn kiểu miền Tây; Khác
tr: Sele kullanım disiplini: Çok amaçlı (GP); Avustralya Stock; Varil Yarışı; Cutting; Dresaj; Dayanıklılık/Trekking; İngiliz (Genel); Eventing; İber/İspanyol; Engel Atlama/Yakın Temas; Askeri/Polis; Polo; Yarış/Antrenman; Çiftlik/Wade; Reining; Roping; Arazi/Hobi; Western (Genel); Western Show; Diğer
ru: Дисциплина седла: Универсальное (GP); Австралийское пастушье; Баррел-рейсинг; Каттинг; Выездка; Пробеги/треккинг; Английское (общее); Троеборье; Иберийское/испанское; Конкур/плотный контакт; Военное/полицейское; Поло; Скаковое/тренировочное; Ранчо/уэйд; Рейнинг; Роупинг; Прогулочное; Вестерн (общее); Вестерн-шоу; Другое
bg-BG: Дисциплина на седлото: Универсално (GP); Австралийско работно; Барел рейсинг; Кътинг; Обездижане; Издръжливост/преходи; Английско (общо); Всестранна езда; Иберийско/испанско; Прескачане на препятствия/близък контакт; Военно/полицейско; Поло; Състезателно/тренировъчно; Ранчо/Wade; Рейнинг; Роупинг; Преходи/свободна езда; Уестърн (общо); Уестърн шоу; Друго
fi: Satulan käyttölaji: Yleiskäyttö (GP); Australialainen karjasatula; Tynnyriratsastus; Cutting; Kouluratsastus; Matkaratsastus/vaellus; Englantilainen (yleinen); Kenttäratsastus; Iberialainen/espanjalainen; Esteratsastus / close contact; Sotilas/poliisi; Poolo; Laukkaurheilu/harjoittelu; Ranch/Wade; Reining; Roping; Maastoratsastus / western pleasure; Lännenratsastus (yleinen); Western show; Muu
pl: Dyscyplina dla siodła: Wszechstronne; Australijskie; Barrel racing; Cutting; Ujeżdżenie; Rajdy/Trekking; Klasyczne (ogólne); WKKW; Iberyjskie/Hiszpańskie; Skokowe/Close contact; Wojskowe/Policyjne; Polo; Wyścigowe/Treningowe; Ranczo/Wade; Reining; Roping; Trail/Pleasure; Western (ogólne); Western Show; Inne
lt-LT: Balnelio disciplina: Universalus (GP); Australiško stiliaus; Statinės jodinėjimo varžyboms; Galvijų atskyrimo (Cutting); Išjodinėjimo; Ištvermės jojimo / turizmo; Angliško stiliaus (universalus); Trikovės; Iberijos / ispaniškas; Konkūrinis / artimo kontakto; Karinis / policijos; Polo; Lenktynių / treniruočių; Rančos / „Wade“ stiliaus; Vesterno išjodinėjimo („Reining“); Vesterno varžyboms („Roping“); Laisvalaikio jojimo; Vesterno (universalus); Vesterno parodoms; Kita
nb: Saldisiplin: Allround (GP); Australsk stock; Barrel racing; Cutting; Dressur; Distanse/tur; Engelsk (generell); Feltritt; Iberisk/spansk; Sprang / close contact; Militær/politi; Polo; Galopp/trening; Ranch/Wade; Reining; Roping; Trail/pleasure; Western (generell); Western show; Annet
zh-CN: 马鞍项目: 综合（GP）; 澳大利亚原野; 绕桶赛; 截牛; 盛装舞步; 耐力赛/长途骑行; 英式（通用）; 三日赛; 伊比利亚/西班牙; 障碍赛/紧密接触; 军警用; 马球; 竞速/训练; 牧场/韦德; 控马; 套牛; 休闲/越野; 西部（通用）; 西部表演; 其他
cs: Disciplína v sedle: Všestranné (Vš); Australské honácké; Barrel racing; Cutting; Drezurní; Vytrvalostní / turistické; Anglické (obecné); Všestrannost (military); Iberské / španělské; Skokové / close contact; Vojenské / policejní; Polo; Dostihové / tréninkové; Rančerské / Wade; Reining; Roping; Trail / pleasure; Westernové (obecné); Western show; Jiné
th: ประเภทอานม้า: อเนกประสงค์ (GP); ออสเตรเลียนสต็อก; ขี่ม้าอ้อมถัง; ต้อนวัว; ศิลปะการบังคับม้า (Dressage); เอ็นดูแรนซ์/เดินป่า; อังกฤษ (ทั่วไป); อีเวนติ้ง; ไอบีเรีย/สเปน; กระโดด/โคลสคอนแทค; ทหาร/ตำรวจ; โปโล; แข่งขัน/ออกกำลังกาย; แรนช์/เวด; เรนนิ่ง; โรปปิ้ง; ขี่ม้าชมธรรมชาติ/พักผ่อน; เวสเทิร์น (ทั่วไป); เวสเทิร์นโชว์; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Disciplina sedla: Večnamensko (GP); Avstralsko sedlo; Barrel Racing; Cutting; Dresura; Vzdržljivostno/treking; Angleško (splošno); Eventing; Ibersko/špansko; Preskakovanje zaprek / tesen stik; Vojaško/policijsko; Polo; Dirkanje/trening; Ranč/Wade; Reining; Roping; Terensko/rekreativno; Western (splošno); Razstavno western sedlo; Drugo